Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0077.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 11. (1) For the fiscal year ending September 30, 2025, there is appropriated for the public schools of this state and certain other state purposes relating to education the sum of $17,769,551,300.00 from the state school aid fund, the sum of $78,830,600.00 $85,530,600.00 from the general fund, an amount not to exceed $41,000,000.00 from the community district education trust fund created under section 12 of the Michigan trust fund act, 2000 PA 489, MCL 12.262, an amount not to exceed $125,000,000.00 from the school transportation fund created under section 22k, an amount not to exceed $71,000,000.00 from the enrollment stabilization fund created under section 29, an amount not to exceed $30,000,000.00 from the school meals reserve fund created under section 30e, an amount not to exceed $18,000,000.00 from the great start readiness program reserve fund created under section 32e, an amount not to exceed $334,100,000.00 from the MPSERS retirement obligation reform reserve fund created under section 147b, and an amount not to exceed $30,000,000.00 from the educator fellowship public provider fund created in section 27d. In addition, all available federal funds are only appropriated as allocated in this article for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2025. (2) The appropriations under this section are allocated as provided in this article. Money appropriated under this section from the general fund must be expended to fund the purposes of this article before the expenditure of money appropriated under this section from the state school aid fund. (3) Any general fund allocations under this article that are not expended by the end of the fiscal year are transferred to the school aid stabilization fund created under section 11a. Sec. 97n. (1) From the general fund money appropriated in section 11, $6,700,000.00 is allocated for 2024-2025 to public schools and nonpublic schools for the implementation of a mobile panic alert system in each school as required under section 1308c of the revised school code, MCL 380.1308c. (2) The funds allocated under this section for 2024-2025 are a work project appropriation, and any unexpended funds for 2024-2025 are carried forward into 2025-2026. The purpose of the work project is to implement mobile panic alert systems in public schools and nonpublic schools. The estimated completion date of the work project is September 30, 2027. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 76 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.